test/src/gt-norm-yamls/myv-tests-noun_gt-norm.yaml
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетненеккак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетненеккак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканкседеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканкседеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканксекскак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканксекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксеськак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксеськак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксентькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксентькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксентеньгак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксентеньгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканкседентькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканкседентькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксесэнтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксесэнтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксестэнтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксестэнтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксевантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксевантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксевтементькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксевтементькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксешкантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксешкантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксексэнтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксексэнтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетненьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетненьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнененьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнененьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнедеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнедеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнесэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнесэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнестэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнестэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнескак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнескак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетневаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетневаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнекскак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетневгак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетневгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетненеккак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетненеккак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасонокседеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасонокседеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксекскак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксеськак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксеськак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксентькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксентькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксентеньгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксентеньгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонокседентькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонокседентькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксесэнтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксесэнтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксестэнтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксестэнтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксевантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксевантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксевтементькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксевтементькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксешкантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксешкантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксексэнтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксексэнтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетненьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетненьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнененьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнененьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнедеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнедеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнесэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнесэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнестэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнестэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнескак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнескак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетневаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетневаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнекскак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетневгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетневгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетненеккак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетненеккак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакастонокседеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакастонокседеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксекскак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксеськак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксеськак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксентькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксентькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксентеньгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксентеньгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонокседентькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонокседентькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксесэнтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксесэнтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксестэнтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксестэнтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксевантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксевантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксевтементькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксевтементькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксешкантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксешкантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксексэнтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксексэнтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетнеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетнеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетненьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетненьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетнененьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетнененьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетнедеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетнедеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетнесэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетнесэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетнестэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетнестэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетнескак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастоноксетнескак
